Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Article 2. Employment and Training Program

§ 42-2-201.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Program” means the employment and training program created under this article;

“Support services” includes transportation, child care and other services necessary to enable participants in the program to participate without hardship to themselves or their families.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 42-2-202.
Participation required; exemptions; disqualification of benefits.

If available within the county of his residence, any person receiving benefits from the department under the supplemental nutrition assistance or personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) programs shall as a condition of receiving any benefits, participate in the employment and training program unless he:

Is not physically able to work;

Is determined to be unemployable by an employment assessment conducted pursuant to department rule or regulation; or

Qualifies for a good cause exemption under rule and regulation of the department.

Any person not exempt under this section and failing to participate in the program as required under this article may be disqualified from receiving benefits under the supplemental nutrition assistance or personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) programs. A good cause exemption may be requested at any time by a benefit recipient.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title all nonexempt recipients under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program in the state shall be required to work or perform community service as defined by rules and regulations of the department subject to coordination with the United States department of health and human services if required. Recipients may be exempted from the requirement under this subsection if one (1) of the nonexempt recipients within the assistance unit:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 196, § 2.

Except as provided in paragraph (c)(iv) of this section, has a child who has not attained the age of three (3) months;

Gives birth to a child after ten (10) months as a recipient under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program. The recipient under this paragraph shall be exempted from the requirements under this section for a period of three (3) months after the child is born, unless the parent is a minor child in which case the recipient shall be required to attend school in accordance with paragraph (v) of this subsection;

Is a minor child who is required to attend school pursuant to W.S.

21-4-102

; or

For other good cause as determined by the department.

Benefits and eligibility requirements under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program shall be modified for assistance units under subsection (c) of this section as follows:

Assistance units complying with subsection (c) of this section shall receive full benefits to which they are otherwise entitled under this title;

In an assistance unit having a minor who has completed the eighth grade or has attained sixteen (16) years of age, but has not yet graduated from high school and refuses to attend school or accept suitable employment if the parent will not cooperate with the appropriate authorities as specified in a plan approved by the department to resolve the problem, the assistance unit shall not receive a performance payment for any month the minor refuses to attend school or accept suitable employment;

Monthly earned income of a dependent full-time student up to the age of eighteen (18), excluding minor parents, shall not be included as income and resources in determining the eligibility of the assistance unit for assistance and the amount of assistance while the student is living in the residence of his caretaker relative;

In assistance units in which recipients not otherwise exempted from the requirements of subsection (c) of this section, the assistance unit shall not receive a performance payment for any month the recipient fails to comply with subsection (c) of this section and the recipient shall not be eligible for medical assistance under chapter 4 of this title until the recipient complies with the provisions of this section;

Excluding allowance for personal motor vehicles as specified under W.S. 42-2-109(b), the amount of assets an assistance unit may own shall be not greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00).

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 169, § 1; 1995, ch. 131, § 1; ch. 211, § 1; 1996, ch. 111, § 2; 1997, ch. 196, § 1; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “supplemental nutrition assistance” for “food stamp” in (a) and (b).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (d)(v), substituted “assets” for “resources” and “not greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00)” for “two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00)”

Federal government. —

Laws 1997, ch. 196, § 4, provides: “If the federal government attempts, contrary to law, to impose any interpretation on P.L. 104-109 [P.L. 104-193] that prevents the state from using state maintenance of effort funds as the state wishes or which requires state maintenance of effort funds to comply with restrictions not found in state law, the attorney general shall seek to the extent practical an appropriate legal or equitable remedy to prevent the federal government from enforcing any such interpretation.”

Laws 1997, ch. 196, § 6, provides: “All state agencies having any responsibilities in implementing any portion of welfare reform in Wyoming shall cooperate to facilitate the goals of welfare reform in Wyoming and avoid duplication of effort. The agencies shall, to the extent the governor deems appropriate, enter into memoranda of understanding as necessary to coordinate their duties and fulfill their responsibilities in implementing welfare reform in Wyoming.”

§ 42-2-203.
Establishment of program; powers and duties of division.

The department shall:

Establish an employment and training program which shall include job registration and may include job search employment training, work experience and support services;

Establish the program in as many counties as is feasible given funding limitations, cost effectiveness, geography and unemployment in the county;

Enter into cooperative agreements with other agencies providing employment training and experience programs to prevent duplication;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 179, § 2.

Provide participants a copy of the rules and regulations promulgated by the department for the program on participation and for fair hearings.

The department may contract with public agencies and private entities to implement this article. The department may promulgate rules and regulations to implement this article.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 2017 ch. 179, § 2, effective March 6, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

deleted (a)(iv).

Laws 2017, ch. 179, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.